.github/vale/dicts/aiven.dic
188
ACL
ACLs
Addons
Aiven
Aiven's
Altinity
Amazon
Apache
API
APIs
ARN
Astacus
Auth0
autovacuum
Avro
AZ
AZs
Azure
binlog
boolean
boot
Bucardo
business
Cassandra
Centrify
checkpointing
ClickHouse
CloudWatch
codecs
compliances
Conduktor
Confluent
Coralogix
connect
Couchbase
CPU/MS
CRD
cyber
datacenter
datacenters
Datadog
Datagen
datagen
datasource
Datastax
datastore
dashboards
deallocation
Debezium
deserialize
deserialization
deserializer
Dev
Digitransit
Distro
Docker
dockerized
downsampled
downsampling
DSBulk
DZone
Elasticsearch
Epicurious
etcd
failover
fileset
filesets
Flink
Gantt
geocoder
geocoding
geohash
Geomap
geospatial
GitHub
go
Google Cloud Platform
Gradle
Grafana/M
GSuite
hardcoded
HashiCorp
Homebrew
Heatmap
hobbyist
hostname
hostnames
Hillyer
httpie
hyperloglog
hyperloglogs
hypertable
hypertables
InfluxDB
InnoDB
Instana
io
IPsec
Java
JMX
JobManager
Jolokia
Kaggle/M
Kafdrop
Kafka
Karapace
keypair
keyspace
keystore
keystores
Kibana
Klaw
Kpow
Kubernetes
kuromoji
Loggly
Logstash
Logtail
Lua
Lucene
myhoard
M3
Memorystore
Mezmo
MirrorMaker
MongoDB
MySQL
myhoard
namespace/MS
NodeJS
nosqlbench
npm
NVMe
OAuth
Okta
onboarding
OpenSearch
operator
overcommit
overcommitted
Pagerduty
Pagila
Papertrail
parallelization
peering
peerings
Percona
performant
pgAdmin
PgBouncer
PGHoard
pglookout
plaintext
plc
PNG/S
Plotly
Podman
pooler
PostgreSQL
Postman
preformatted
privatelink
Prometheus
Protobuf
Provectus
psql
Python
rebalance
rebalances
rebalancing
Redis
Redli
refcard
reindexing
reStructuredText
rivery
rsyslog
safelist
safelisting
Sakila
SAML
SBOM
Sarama
savepoint
Savepoints
savepoints
schemaless
scriptable
serde
serializer
sharded
sharding
signup
signups
Singlestat
skyvia
Snowflake
Sphinx
SLA/S
Slackbot
Splunk
spring
Sql
SSD/S
Stackdriver
Statusmap
Stunnel
subnet
subnets
subprocess
subprocesses
subtab
syslog
TaskManager
Telegraf
Terraform
Terraforming
TimescaleDB
toolchain
Transport Layer Security
truststore
truststores
Uber
UDFs
unassign
uncomment
unencrypted
untrusted
unaggregated
UpCloud
upsert
VM
VMs
VPC/MS
VNet
wget
Workbench
Worldmap
worldPing
Zabbix
zapier
Zipkin
ZooKeeper
